Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1755.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this part which are applicable to specific provisions of this part, the following words and phrases when used in this part shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Tow truck operator." A person performing towing in this Commonwealth, including the owner or operator of towing equipment."Towing." As follows:12345678910111213141516171819 (1) As defined in the act of July 5, 2012 (P.L.990, No.110), known as the Towing and Towing Storage Facility Standards Act.(2) The term includes the moving, removing or recovery of a wrecked, abandoned or disabled motor vehicle.(3) The term includes the moving of a vehicle to or from an auction.* * *Section 2. Section 512 of Title 66 is amended to read:§ 512. Power of commission to require insurance.(a) Authorization.--The commission may, as to motor carriers and tow truck operators, prescribe, by regulation or order, such requirements as it may deem necessary for the protection of persons or property of their patrons and the public, including the filing of surety bonds, the carrying of insurance, or the qualifications and conditions under which such carriers may act as self-insurers with respect to such matters.(b) Motor carriers.--All motor carriers shall cover each and every vehicle with a public liability insurance policy or a surety bond issued by an insurance carrier or a bonding company authorized to do business in this Commonwealth to provide for the payment of valid accident claims against the insured for bodily injury to or the death of persons, or the loss or damage to property of others resulting from the operation, maintenance or use of a motor vehicle in the insured authorized service in such amounts as the commission may prescribe, but not less than $750,000 for any one accident.(c) Tow truck operators.--All tow truck operators shall cover each and every vehicle with a public liability insurance policy or a surety bond issued by an insurance carrier or a 20250HB1755PN2162 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bonding company authorized to do business in this Commonwealth to provide for the payment of valid accident claims against the insured for bodily injury to or the death of persons, or the loss or damage to property of others resulting from the operation, maintenance or use of a motor vehicle in the insured authorized service, in such amounts as the commission may prescribe, but not less than $750,000 for any one accident.(d) Motor carriers of passengers.--All motor carriers of passengers, whose current liquid assets do not exceed their current liabilities by at least $100,000, shall cover each and every vehicle, transporting such passengers, with a public liability insurance policy or a surety bond issued by an insurance carrier or a bonding company authorized to do business in this Commonwealth, in such amounts as the commission may prescribe, but not less than $5,000 for one and $10,000 for more than one person injured in any one accident.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1755PN2162 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617